California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(2) Furnish to that other person, in the manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, the information provided by that partnership under subdivision (b).

(d) The provisions of Section 6031(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the separate statement of items of unrelated business taxable income, shall apply.

(e) The provisions of Section 6031(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to electing investment partnerships, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(f) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to returns for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 348, Sec. 2.   (AB 1775)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18633.5.

(a) Every limited liability company that is classified as a partnership for California tax purposes that is doing business in this state, organized in this state, or registered with the Secretary of State shall file its return on or before the 15th day of the third month following the close of its taxable year, stating specifically the items of gross income and the deductions allowed by Part 10
 (commencing with Section 17001). The return shall include the names, addresses, and taxpayer identification numbers of the persons, whether residents or nonresidents, who would be entitled to share in the net income if distributed and the amount of the distributive share of each person. The return shall contain or be verified by a written declaration that it is made under penalty of perjury, signed by one of the limited liability company members. In the case of a limited liability company not doing business in this state, and subject to the tax imposed by subdivision (b) of Section 17941, the Franchise Tax Board shall, for returns required to be filed on or after January 1, 1998, prescribe the manner and extent to which the information identified in this subdivision shall be included with the return required by this subdivision.

(b) Each limited liability company required to file a return under subdivision (a) for any limited liability company
 taxable year shall, on or before the day on which the return for that taxable year was required to be filed, furnish to each person who holds an interest in that limited liability company at any time during that taxable year a copy of that information required to be shown on that return as may be required by forms and instructions prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(c) Any person who holds an interest in a limited liability company as a nominee for another person shall do both of the following:

(1) Furnish to the limited liability company, in the manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, the name, address, and taxpayer identification number of that person, and any other information for that taxable year as the Franchise Tax Board may prescribe by forms and instructions.

(2) Furnish to that other person, in
 the manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, the information provided by that limited liability company under subdivision (b).

(d) The provisions of Section 6031(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the separate statement of items of unrelated business taxable income, shall apply.

(e) (1) A limited liability company shall file with its return required under subdivision (a), in the form required by the Franchise Tax Board, the agreement of each nonresident member to file a return pursuant to Section 18501, to make timely payment of all taxes imposed on the member by this state with respect to the income of the limited liability company, and to be subject to personal jurisdiction in this state for purposes of the collection of income taxes, together with related interest and penalties, imposed on the member by this state with respect to the income
 of the limited liability company. If the limited liability company fails to timely file the agreements on behalf of each of its nonresident members, then the limited liability company shall, at the time set forth in subdivision (f), pay to this state on behalf of each nonresident member of whom an agreement has not been timely filed an amount equal to the highest marginal tax rate in effect under Section 17041, in the case of members that are individuals, estates, or trusts, and Section 23151, in the case of members that are corporations, multiplied by the amount of the member’s distributive share of the income source to the state reflected on the limited liability company’s return for the taxable period, reduced by the amount of tax previously withheld and paid by the limited liability company pursuant to Section 18662 and the regulations thereunder with respect to each nonresident member. A limited liability company shall be entitled to recover the payment made from the member on whose behalf the payment
 was made.

(2) If a limited liability company fails to attach the agreement or to timely pay the payment required by paragraph (1), the payment shall be considered the tax of the limited liability company for purposes of the penalty prescribed by Section 19132 and interest prescribed by Section 19101 for failure to timely pay the tax. Payment of the penalty and interest imposed on the limited liability company for failure to timely pay the amount required by this subdivision shall extinguish the liability of a nonresident member for the penalty and interest for failure to make timely payment of all taxes imposed on that member by this state with respect to the income of the limited liability company.

(3) No penalty or interest shall be imposed on the limited liability company under paragraph (2) if the nonresident member timely files and pays all taxes imposed on the member by this
 state with respect to the income of the limited liability company.

(f) Any agreement of a nonresident member required to be filed pursuant to subdivision (e) shall be filed at either of the following times:

(1) The time the annual return is required to be filed pursuant to this section for the first taxable period for which the limited liability company became subject to tax pursuant to Chapter 10.6 (commencing with Section 17941).

(2) The time the annual return is required to be filed pursuant to this section for any taxable period in which the limited liability company had a nonresident member on whose behalf an agreement described in subdivision (e) has not been previously filed.

(g) Any amount paid by the limited liability company to this state
 pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) shall be considered to be a payment by the member on account of the income tax imposed by this state on the member for the taxable period.

(h) Every limited liability company that is classified as a corporation for California tax purposes shall be subject to the requirement to file a tax return under the provisions of Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) and the applicable taxes imposed by Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(i) (1) Every limited liability company doing business in this state, organized in this state, or registered with the Secretary of State, that is disregarded pursuant to Section 23038 shall file a return that includes information necessary to verify its liability under Sections 17941 and 17942, provides its sole owner’s name and taxpayer identification number, includes the consent of
 the owner to California tax jurisdiction, and includes other information necessary for the administration of this part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(2) If the owner’s consent required under paragraph (1) is not included, the limited liability company shall pay on behalf of its owner an amount consistent with, and treated the same as, the amount to be paid under subdivision (e) by a limited liability company on behalf of a nonresident member for whom an agreement required by subdivision (e) is not attached to the return of the limited liability company.

(3) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the return required under paragraph (1) shall be filed on or before the 15th day of the fourth month after the close of the taxable year of the owner subject to tax under Part 10 (commencing with Section
 17001) or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101) of Part 11.

(B) In the event that the owner is an “S corporation,” a partnership, or a limited liability company classified as a partnership for California tax purposes, the return required under paragraph (1) shall be filed on or before the 15th day of the third month after the close of the taxable year.

(4) For limited liability companies disregarded pursuant to Section 23038, “taxable year of the owner” shall be substituted for “taxable year” in Sections 17941 and 17942.

(j) The amendments made by Chapter 264 of the Statutes of 2005 apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2005.

(k) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to returns for
 taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 348, Sec. 3.   (AB 1775)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18635.

Every trust claiming a charitable, religious, scientific, literary, or educational deduction under Section 642(c) of the Internal Revenue Code for the taxable year shall furnish information with respect to the taxable year, at the time and in the manner as the Franchise Tax Board may by regulations prescribe, setting forth all of the following:

(a) The amount of the charitable, religious, scientific, literary, or educational deduction taken under Section 642(c) of the
 Internal Revenue Code within that year (showing separately the amount of the deduction which was paid out and the amount which was permanently set aside for charitable, religious, scientific, literary, or educational purposes during that year).

(b) The amount paid out within that year which represents amounts for which charitable, religious, scientific, literary, or educational deductions under Section 642(c) of the Internal Revenue Code have been taken in prior years.

(c) The amount for which charitable, religious, scientific, literary, or educational deductions have been taken in prior years but which has not been paid out at the beginning of that year.

(d) The amount paid out of principal in the current and prior years for charitable, religious, scientific, literary, or educational purposes.

(e) The total income of the trust within that year and the expenses attributable thereto.

(f) A balance sheet showing the assets, liabilities, and net worth of the trust as of the beginning of that year.

This section shall not apply in the case of a taxable year if all the taxable income for that year, determined under the applicable principles of the law of trusts, is required to be distributed currently to the beneficiaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18635.5.

(a) Section 6034A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to information to beneficiaries of estates and trusts, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 6034A(a) is modified to refer to Section 18505 in lieu of Section 6012(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) Section 6034A(c)(3) is modified to refer to Section 19051 in lieu of Section 6213(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(d) Section 6034A(c)(5) is modified to refer to Article 7 of Chapter 4 of this part in lieu of Part II of Subchapter A of Chapter 68 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 863, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

18639.

(a) (1) In addition to those reports required under paragraph (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 18631, information returns shall be required, at the time and in the form and manner and to the extent that the Franchise Tax Board may prescribe, from both of the following:

(A) Every person who makes payments of
 exempt-interest dividends, as described in Section 852(b)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, that are not exempt-interest dividends, as described in Section 17145 of this code, aggregating ten dollars ($10) or more to any person, other than to any person described in paragraph (2), during any calendar year.

(B) Every person who receives payments of interest as a nominee and who makes payments aggregating ten dollars ($10) or more during any calendar year to any other person, other than to any person described in paragraph (2), with respect to the interest so received. For purposes of this paragraph, “interest” is limited to interest on any obligation if the interest is exempt from tax under Section 103(a) of the Internal Revenue Code or if the interest is exempt from tax, without regard to the identity of the holder, under any other provision of Title 26 of the United States Code, but which is not exempt from income tax under Part 10 (commencing
 with Section 17001).

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, a person shall not be required to make a report pursuant to paragraph (1) if the person receiving the payment is any of the following:

(A) A corporation.

(B) An organization exempt from taxation under Section 23701 or an individual retirement plan.

(C) The United States or any wholly owned agency or instrumentality thereof.

(D) A state, the District of Columbia, a possession of the United States, any political subdivision of any of the foregoing, or any wholly owned agency or instrumentality of any one or more of the foregoing.

(E) A foreign government, a political
 subdivision of a foreign government, or any wholly owned agency or instrumentality of any one or more of the foregoing.

(F) An international organization or any wholly owned agency or instrumentality thereof.

(G) A foreign central bank of issue.

(H) A dealer in securities or commodities required to register under the laws of the United States or a state, the District of Columbia, or possession of the United States.

(I) A real estate investment trust, as defined in Section 856 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(J) An investment company, as defined in Section 80a-3 of the United States Code, registered at all times during the taxable year under the Investment Company Act of 1940.

(K) A common trust fund, as defined in Section 17671.

(L) Any trust that is exempt from tax under Section 664(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) Every person required to make a return under this section shall also furnish a statement to each person whose name is set forth in the return, as required to do so by the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 276.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18640.

(a) Any corporation allocating amounts as patronage dividends, rebates, or refunds (whether in cash, merchandise, capital stock, revolving fund certificates, retain certificates, certificates of indebtedness, letters of advice, or in some other manner that discloses to each patron the amount of the dividend, refund, or rebate) shall render a correct return that shall contain or be verified by a written declaration that it is made under the penalty of perjury, stating both of the following:

(1) The name and address of each patron to whom it has made those allocations amounting to one hundred dollars ($100) or more during the calendar year.

(2) The amount of those allocations to each patron.

If required by the Franchise Tax Board, any corporation described in this subdivision shall render a correct return, which shall contain or be verified by a written declaration that it is under penalty of perjury, of all patronage dividends, rebates, or refunds made during the calendar year to its patrons. This section shall not apply in the case of any corporation exempt from tax under Article 1 (commencing with Section 23701) of Chapter 4 of Part 11.

(b) Every cooperative required to make a return under subdivision (a) shall furnish to each person whose name is required to be
 set forth in that return a written statement showing both of the following:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the cooperative required to make that return.

(2) The aggregate amount of the allocations required to be made to the person as shown on that return.

(c) The written statement required under subdivision (b) shall be furnished (either in person or in a separate mailing by first-class mail which includes adequate notice that the statement is enclosed) to the person on or before January 31 of the year following the calendar year for which the return under subdivision (a) was required to be made, and shall be in the form which the Franchise Tax Board may prescribe.

(d) The amendments made by this act adding this subdivision are operative
 for information returns required to be filed on or after January 1, 1999.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 600, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18642.

(a) All owners and transferors of an interest in real property or a mobilehome shall file a return upon written request by the Franchise Tax Board which includes a social security number or other identification number prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, identification of the property interest, and any other pertinent information about the interest requested by the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to any of the
 following:

(1) Property granted a homeowner’s property tax exemption.

(2) Property which is not assessed by a California county assessor.

(c) Owners and transferors failing to file a return required by subdivision (a) on or before the due date of the return shall be subject to the penalty provided by Section 19183, unless the failure is due to reasonable cause and not due to willful neglect.

(d) Owners failing to file a return required by subdivision (a) within 60 days of the due date of the return shall be subject to the sanctions provided by Section 17299.9 disallowing certain expenses related to the property for which a return is required, unless it is shown that the failure is due to reasonable cause and not due to willful neglect.

(e) The Franchise Tax Board shall mail to each owner and transferor required to file a return pursuant to subdivision (a) a notice at least 60 days prior to the due date of the return. The notice shall be in a form and shall include any information which the Franchise Tax Board prescribes and shall advise owners and transferors of all of the following:

(1) The requirement to provide the Franchise Tax Board with a social security number or other identification number prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) When the statement is due.

(3) A general description of the tax consequences of not providing the requested information.

(f) The social security number or other identification number
 furnished pursuant to this section shall be used exclusively for tax administration purposes. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to utilize the social security number or other identification number for the sole purpose of establishing the identification of individuals or entities affected by state tax laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18644.

(a) The operator of a boat on which one or more individuals, during a calendar year, perform services described in subdivision (o) of Section 13009 of the Unemployment Insurance Code shall submit to the Franchise Tax Board (at the time, and in the manner and form, as the Franchise Tax Board shall by regulations prescribe) information respecting all of the following:

(1) The identity of each individual performing those services.

(2) The percentage of each individual’s share of the catches of fish or other forms of aquatic animal life, and the percentage of the operator’s share of those catches.

(3) If that individual receives his or her share in kind, the type and weight of that share, together with the other information as the Franchise Tax Board may prescribe by regulations reasonably necessary to determine the value of those shares.

(4) If that individual receives a share of the proceeds of those catches, the amount so received.

(b) Every person required to make a return under subdivision (a) shall furnish to each person whose name is required to be set forth in that return a written statement showing the information relating to that person contained in that return. The written
 statement required under the preceding sentence shall be furnished to the person on or before January 31 of the year following the calendar year for which the return under subdivision (a) was required to be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18646.

(a) The head of every state agency (as defined by Section 11000 of the Government Code) entering into any contract shall make a return (at the time and in the form the Franchise Tax Board may by regulation prescribe) setting forth all of the following:

(1) The name, address, type of business entity, and taxpayer identification number of each person with which that agency entered into a contract during the calendar year.

(2) Any other information the Franchise Tax Board may require.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board may provide that this section also shall apply to any of the following:

(1) Licenses granted by state agencies.

(2) Subcontracts under contracts to which subdivision (a) applies.

(c) This section shall not apply to contracts or licenses in any class which are below a minimum amount or value which may be determined by the Franchise Tax Board for that class.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18648.

(a) Section 6112 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to material advisors of reportable transactions that must keep lists of advisees, applies except as otherwise
 provided.

(b) Section 6112 of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting the phrase “Secretary or the Franchise Tax Board” for the word “Secretary” each place it appears.

(c) The requirement to maintain lists under this section shall apply to any material advisor, as defined in Section 6111 of the Internal Revenue Code, with respect to any reportable transaction, as defined in Section 6707A(c) of the Internal Revenue Code and regardless of whether a return is required to be filed under Section 18628 with respect to that reportable transaction and with respect to a material advisor that satisfies any of the following conditions:

(1) Is organized in this state.

(2) Is doing business in this state.

(3) Derives income from sources in this state.

(4) Provides any material aid, assistance, or advice with respect to organizing, managing, promoting, selling, implementing, insuring, or carrying out any reportable transaction with respect to a taxpayer that meets any of the following conditions:

(A) Is organized in this state.

(B) Does business in this state.

(C) Derives income from sources in this state.

(d) (1) In addition to any regulation issued under Section 6112 of the Internal Revenue Code, the list required to be maintained by this section for listed transactions, as defined in Section 6707A(c)(2) of
 the Internal Revenue Code, shall be maintained in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to any requirement prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board under this section.

(3) For transactions entered into on or after February 28, 2000, that become listed transactions (as defined under Section 6707A(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code) at any time, the lists shall be provided to the Franchise Tax Board by the later of:

(A) Sixty days after entering into the transaction.

(B) Sixty days after the transaction becomes a listed transaction.

(4) For transactions
 entered into on or after September 2, 2003, that are specifically identified by the Franchise Tax Board for California income or franchise tax purposes (under the authority of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 18407) as a “listed transaction” at any time, the list shall be provided to the Franchise Tax Board by the later of:

(A) Sixty days after entering into the transaction.

(B) Sixty days after the transaction becomes a listed transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 43.5.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

18648.5.

(a) Section 6115 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to disclosure related to quid pro quo contributions, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) The requirements of subdivision (a) shall be treated as being satisfied upon a showing that the requirements in Section 6115 of the Internal Revenue Code have been met with respect to that contribution for federal purposes.

(c) The provisions of this
 section shall apply to quid pro quo contributions made on or after January 1, 1997.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 611, Sec. 56.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18649.

A copy of the information furnished pursuant to Section 1275(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be provided to the Franchise Tax Board by any issuer subject to tax under this part at the time and in the manner required by the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Withholding [18661. - 18677.]

18661.

When necessary to make effective the provisions of this article or Article 4 (commencing with Section 18631), the name, address, social security number, or other taxpayer identification number of the recipient of income shall be furnished upon demand of the person paying the income.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 16, Sec. 2.   (AB 18 4x)   Effective January 23, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

18662.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may, by regulation, require any person, in whatever capacity acting, including lessees or mortgagors of real or personal property, fiduciaries, employers, and any officer or department of the state, or any political subdivision or agency of the state, or any city organized under a freeholder’s charter, or any political body not a subdivision or agency of the state, having the control, receipt, custody, disposal, or payment of items of income specified in subdivision (b), to withhold an amount, determined by the Franchise Tax Board to reasonably represent the amount of tax due when the items of income are included with other income of the taxpayer, and to transmit the amount withheld to the Franchise Tax Board at the time as it may designate.

(b) The items of income referred to in subdivision (a) are interest, dividends, rents, prizes and winnings, premiums, annuities, emoluments, compensation for services, including bonuses, partnership income or gains, and other fixed or determinable annual or periodical gains, profits, and income.

(c) The Franchise Tax Board may authorize the tax under subdivision (a) to be deducted and withheld from the interest upon any securities the owners of which are not known to the withholding agent.

(d) Any person that fails to withhold from any payments any amounts required to be withheld by this section or fails to remit the taxes withheld is liable for the amount specified in Section 18668.

(e) (1) This subdivision applies to any disposition
 of a California real property interest by:

(A) Any person, other than either of the following:

(i) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, a corporation, including an entity classified for tax purposes as a corporation under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(ii) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, a partnership, as determined in accordance with Subchapter K of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, including an entity classified as a partnership for tax purposes under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001).

(B) A corporation or partnership, if that corporation or partnership immediately after the transfer of the title to the California real property has no permanent place of business in California. For
 purposes of this subdivision, a corporation or partnership has no permanent place of business in California if all of the following apply:

(i) It is not organized and existing under the laws of California.

(ii) It does not qualify with the office of the Secretary of State to transact business in California.

(iii) It does not maintain and staff a permanent office in California.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), in the case of any disposition of a California real property interest by a transferor described in paragraph (1), the transferee, including for this purpose any intermediary or accommodator in a deferred exchange, is required to withhold an amount equal to
 313 percent of the sales price of the California real property conveyed.

(B) If the transferor makes an election under this subparagraph, the transferee, including any intermediary or accommodator in a deferred exchange, is required to withhold an amount equal to an amount certified by the transferor in writing under penalty of perjury. The amount certified shall not be less than the gain required to be recognized under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) on the disposition of the California real property multiplied by the rate specified in either Section 23151 or Section 23186, as applicable, for transferors that are corporations, or the highest rate specified in Section 17041 for transferors other than corporations. For purposes of applying the previous sentence, the following shall apply:

(i) The highest rate specified in Section 17041 is determined without regard to any other tax rate specified under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) irrespective of whether the applicable statute provides that tax shall be treated as if imposed under Section 17041.

(ii) For corporations that are “S” corporations subject to the modified tax rate specified in Section 23802, the rate shall be the sum of the rate specified in subdivision (b) of Section 23802 and the highest rate specified in Section 17041, as described in clause (i).

(C) (i) The written certification required by subparagraph (B) shall be in a form, as prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board. The form shall provide as follows:

“Title and escrow persons and exchange accommodators are
 not authorized to provide legal or accounting advice for purposes of determining withholding amounts. Transferors are strongly encouraged to consult with a competent tax professional for this purpose.”

(ii) The Franchise Tax Board shall make this form available electronically on its Web site in a format that allows a transferor to complete and print the form. The Franchise Tax Board shall also provide electronic means to enable the transferor to estimate the amount of gain required to be recognized by the transferor in the transaction. Any form or worksheet, electronic or otherwise, developed for this purpose shall provide as follows:

“Title and escrow persons and exchange accommodators are not authorized to provide legal or accounting advice for purposes of determining withholding amounts. Transferors are strongly encouraged to consult with a competent tax professional for this
 purpose.”

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subdivision, all of the following shall apply:

(A) No transferee is required to withhold any amount under this subdivision unless the sales price of the California real property conveyed exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(B) No transferee, other than an intermediary or an accommodator in a deferred exchange, is required to withhold any amount under this subdivision unless written notification of the withholding requirements of this subdivision has been provided by the real estate escrow person.

(C) (i) No transferee, trustee under a deed of trust, or mortgagee under a mortgage with a power of sale is required to withhold under this subdivision when the
 transferee has acquired California real property at a sale pursuant to a power of sale under a mortgage or deed of trust or a sale pursuant to a decree of foreclosure or has acquired the property by a deed in lieu of foreclosure.

(ii) No transferee is required to withhold under this subdivision when the transferor is a bank acting as trustee other than a trustee of a deed of trust.

(D) No transferee, including for this purpose any intermediary or accommodator in a deferred exchange, is required to withhold any amount under this subdivision if the transferee, in good faith and based on all the information of which the transferee has knowledge, relies on a written certificate executed
 by the transferor, certifying, under penalty of perjury, one of the following:

(i) (I) The California real property being conveyed is the seller’s or decedent’s principal residence, within the meaning of Section 121 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(II) The last use of the property being conveyed was use by the transferor as the transferor’s principal residence within the meaning of Section 121 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(ii) (I) The California real property being conveyed is being exchanged, or will be exchanged, for property of like kind, within the meaning of Section 1031 of the Internal Revenue Code, but only to the extent of the amount of the gain not required to be recognized for California income or franchise tax purposes under Section 1031 of the Internal Revenue
 Code.

(II) Subclause (I) may not apply if an exchange does not qualify for nonrecognition treatment for California income or franchise tax purposes under Section 1031 of the Internal Revenue Code, in whole or in part, due to the failure of the transaction to comply with the provisions of Section 1031(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the requirement that property be identified and that the exchange be completed not more than 180 days after the transfer of the exchanged property.

(III) In any case where clause (ii) applies, the transferee, including for this purpose any intermediary or accommodator in a deferred exchange, is required to notify the Franchise Tax Board in writing within 10 days of the expiration of the statutory periods specified in Section 1031(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and thereafter remit the applicable withholding amounts determined under
 this subdivision in accordance with paragraph (4), but only to the extent that an intermediary or accommodator has received amounts from the disposition of California real property and has not disbursed those amounts for the purpose of completing an exchange or exchanges within the meaning of Section 1031 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exchange of real property held for productive use or investment.

(IV) (ia) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe any regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of subclause (III), including, but not limited to, any regulations to clarify the meaning of disbursement for the purpose of
 completing an exchange or exchanges within the meaning of Section 1031 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(ib) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules, guidelines, procedures, or other guidance to carry out the purposes of subclause (III). Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, procedure, or other guidance prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to subclause (III).

(iii) The California real property has been compulsorily or involuntarily converted, within the meaning of Section 1033 of the Internal Revenue Code, and the transferor
 intends to acquire property similar or related in service or use so as to be eligible for nonrecognition of gain for California income tax purposes under Section 1033 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(iv) The transaction will result in either a net loss or a net gain not required to be recognized for California income or franchise tax purposes.

(v) The transferor is a corporation with a permanent place of business in California.

(E) (i) In the case of any transaction otherwise subject to this subdivision that qualifies as an “installment sale,” within the meaning of Section 453(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, for California income tax purposes, the provisions of this subdivision shall be separately applied to each principal payment to be made under the terms of the installment sale agreement
 between the parties.

(ii) For purposes of clause (i), subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) does not apply to each individual payment to be received under the terms of the installment sale agreement.

(4) (A) Amounts withheld and payments made in accordance with this subdivision shall be reported and remitted to the Franchise Tax Board in the form and manner and at the time specified by the Franchise Tax Board. Notwithstanding the foregoing, funds withheld on individual transactions by real estate escrow persons may, at the option of the real estate escrow person, be remitted by the 20th day of the month following the close of escrow for the individual transaction, or may be remitted on a monthly basis in combination with other transactions closed during that month.

(B) The transferor shall submit a
 copy of the written certificate and supporting documentation for the reduced withholding specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) or subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3), executed by the transferor, to the Franchise Tax Board upon request.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, “California real property interest” means an interest in real property located in California and defined in Section 897(c)(1)(A)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(6) For purposes of this subdivision, “real estate escrow person” means any of the following persons involved in the real estate transaction:

(A) The person, including any attorney, escrow company, or title company, responsible for closing the transaction.

(B) If no person described in subparagraph (A) is responsible
 for closing the transaction, then any other person who receives and disburses the consideration or value for the interest or property conveyed.

(7) (A) Unless the real estate escrow person provides “assistance,” it shall be unlawful for any real estate escrow person to charge any customer for complying with the requirements of this subdivision.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “assistance” includes, but is not limited to, helping the parties clarify with the Franchise Tax Board the issue of whether withholding is required under this subdivision or, upon request of the parties, withholding an amount under this subdivision and remitting that amount to the Franchise Tax Board.

(C) For purposes of this paragraph, “assistance” does not include providing the written notification of the withholding
 requirements of this subdivision.
